Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Part B. Contents of Validity or Enforcement

407.5605.
Notice of registration of order.

When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this state shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice shall be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

A notice shall inform the nonregistering party:

That a registered support order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order shall be requested within twenty (20) days of the notice unless the registered order is under KRS

407.5707

;

That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages; and

Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

If the registering party asserts that two (2) or more orders are in effect, a notice shall also:

Identify the two (2) or more orders and the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

State that the procedures provided in subsection (2) of this section apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

Upon registration of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor’s employer pursuant to KRS

403.215

or

405.465

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 50; 1998, ch. 101, § 15, 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 44, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 13, effective July 15, 2016.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Child Support, § 263.00.

407.5606.
Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered order.

A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered support order in this state shall request a hearing within the time required by KRS

407.5605

. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages pursuant to KRS

407.5607

.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

If a nonregistering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered support order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 51; 1998, ch. 101, § 16, 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Child Support, § 263.00.

407.5607.
Contest of registration or enforcement.

A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered support order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one (1) or more of the following defenses:

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

The order was obtained by fraud;

The order has been vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;

The issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

There is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

Full or partial payment has been made;

The statute of limitation under KRS

407.5604

precludes enforcement of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or

The alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.

If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under subsection (1) of this section, a tribunal may stay enforcement of a registered support order, continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence, and issue other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered support order may be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.

If the contesting party does not establish a defense under subsection (1) of this section to the validity or enforcement of a registered support order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 52; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 46, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5608.
Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 53; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 47, effective June 24, 2015.